Georgia, session 2025_26, HB825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to reconstitute the Board of Education of Monroe County, Georgia, approved
February 25, 1993 (Ga. L. 1993, p. 3857), as amended, is amended by revising Section 6 as
follows:
"SECTION 6.
Members and the chairperson of the Board of Education of Monroe County, Georgia, shall
be compensated in the amount of $600.00 per month. Members and the chairperson of the
board shall also be reimbursed for actual expenses necessarily incurred."
H. B. 825
- 1 -

LC 47 3512
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month in which
it is approved by the Governor or in which it becomes law without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 825
- 2 -